Montana, session 2025, HB933.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Short title. [Sections 1 through 15] may be cited as the "Montana
Railroad Crossing Clarity Act".

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Definitions. As used in [sections 1 through 15], unless the context
clearly indicates otherwise, the following definitions apply:
(1) (a) "Annual fee" means an exact and specific price established in an annual fee agreement that
the utility agrees to pay annually to the railroad as consideration for a crossing of the railroad right-of-way or
railroad land.
(b) Existing annual fees are limited to the first annual fee in the original executed agreement
between the railroad and utility.
(c) If a railroad requests an annual fee, the annual fee is limited to 10% of the original crossing fee
or $300.
(d) The term does not include:
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 933

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 933.1
(i) any increases to the exact and specific price established in the annual fee agreement, unless
the exact and specific amount or percentage of increase is established in the annual fee agreement; or
(ii) increases that are at the railroad's discretion.
(2) "Annual fee agreement" is a signed, written agreement that establishes an annual fee.
(3) (a) "Crossing" means the construction, operation, repair, or maintenance of a facility over,
under, or across a railroad right-of-way.
(b) The term includes the construction, operation, repair, or maintenance of a facility that runs
adjacent to and alongside the lines of a railroad within a railroad right-of-way without disturbing railroad lines or
operations, after which the facility crosses the railroad lines, terminates, or exits the railroad right-of-way.
(4) "Crossing fee" is a one-time payment from a utility to a railroad, not to exceed the greater of
$3,000 or 10 dollars for each linear foot for the length of the railroad right-of-way occupied by the crossing.
(5) "Disused rail crossing" means the railroad line of the crossing:
(a) is not capable of operation due to the long-term removal of ties or track; or
(b) is abandoned.
(6) "Facility" includes but is not limited to pipes, sewers, conduits, cables, valves, lines, wires,
manholes, attachments, or any item of personal property placed over, across, or underground for use in
connection with the storage or conveyance of:
(a) water;
(b) sewage;
(c) electronic, telephone, or telegraphic communications;
(d) fiber optics;
(e) cable television;
(f) electric energy;
(g) oil;
(h) natural gas; or
(i) hazardous liquids.
(7) "Prescriptive easement" means a right to cross a railroad if the property of another is acquired
by open, exclusive, notorious, hostile, adverse, continuous, and uninterrupted use for a period of 5 years.
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 933

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 933.1
(8) "Public right-of-way" means the area adjacent to, along, and on any public roads, streets, or
highways in accordance with 69-4-101.
(9) "Railroad" means any association, corporation, or other entity engaged in operating a common
carrier by rail, or its agents or assigns, including any entity responsible for the management of crossings or
collection of crossing fees.
(10) "Railroad land" means land adjacent to railroad lines and owned or controlled, in whole or in
part, by a railroad, its subsidiaries, affiliated businesses, lessees, agents, or other entity controlled in whole or
in part by the railroad or the railroad's parent company.
(11) (a) "Utility" means a public utility, rural telephone cooperative, rural electric cooperative,
transmission company, gas utility, municipal utility, municipal power utility, municipality, pipeline company, rural
water system, or telephone, telegraph, telecommunications, cable, or fiber optic provider.
(b) The term includes contractors and agents hired by a utility.

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Existing agreements. (1) Nothing in [sections 1 through 15] impairs the
existing authority of a utility to secure crossing rights by easement through the power of eminent domain in
accordance with Title 70, chapter 30
(2) A utility is not required to undertake a crossing in accordance with [sections 1 through 15].

NEW SECTION. Section 4. Rights of utilities -- crossings. When the placement of a facility is
outside the public right-of-way, a utility may place a crossing subject to [sections 1 through 15].

NEW SECTION. Section 5. Notice and application for placement of facilities. (1) A utility that
intends to place a crossing shall provide notice of the placement to the railroad at least 30 calendar days prior
to placement.
(2) The notice must be in the form of a completed crossing application, including a drawing
showing the location of the proposed crossing, and the railroad's property, tracks, and wires in relation to where
the utility will cross.
(3) The utility shall submit the crossing application on a form provided or approved by the railroad,
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – HB 933

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 933.1
if available, or provided by the railroad and made available to utilities within 30 calendar days of submission of
an application.
(4) The crossing application must be sent to the railroad by registered or certified mail or by means
of mutually agreed electronic confirmation of receipt.
(5) The crossing application must be accompanied by a certificate of insurance and the crossing
fee, if the crossing fee is required in accordance with [section 7].
(6) (a) If a railroad terminates an annual fee agreement or other crossing agreement or otherwise
orders removal of a crossing without good cause, the utility may notify the railroad, in accordance with this
section, that the utility will maintain the crossing and continue to use the crossing, with the following exceptions:
(i) the crossing fee to maintain an existing crossing is set at $100; and
(ii) a certificate of insurance is not required.
(b) Good cause exists if a facility damages or is likely to damage the railroad or its structures or
any other property on the premises of the railroad, or if a facility endangers the safety of the railroad's operation
or is likely to cause injury or death to a person.

NEW SECTION. Section 6. Right-of-way crossing -- construction. (1) Except as provided in
subsection (2), a utility may commence the construction of the crossing 30 calendar days after the railroad
receives a completed crossing application, certificate of insurance, and crossing fee, if a crossing fee is
permitted in accordance with [section 7].
(2) (a) If a railroad objects to a utility's proposed crossing because the proposal is a serious threat
to the safe operations of the railroad or to the current use of the railroad right-of-way, the railroad shall notify the
utility of the objection and the specific basis for the objection within 15 days after receipt of the utility's
application by registered or certified mail or by means of mutually agreed electronic confirmation of receipt.
(b) If the parties are unable to agree on a resolution to a railroad's objection under subsection
(2)(a), the dispute must be resolved in accordance with [section 10] prior to construction.

NEW SECTION. Section 7. Permissible fees -- crossing fees and annual fees. (1) Unless
otherwise agreed to by the parties and subject to [section 9(2)] and subsections (2) through (7) of this section, a
- 4 - Authorized Print Version – HB 933

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 933.1
utility that places a crossing shall pay the railroad a crossing fee for each crossing.
(2) The crossing fee is in lieu of any license, permit, application, or processing fee, or any other
fees or charges to reimburse the railroad for the direct expenses or diminution of railroad land value incurred by
the railroad as a result of the crossing. Except as provided in subsections (3) through (7), any additional fee or
financial charge may not be assessed by the railroad or by any railroad agent, contractor, or assignee to the
utility or to any agent or contractor of the utility.
(3) (a) A crossing fee may not be imposed for:
(i) the replacement or upgrade of existing utility facilities in a railroad right-of-way and adjacent
railroad land;
(ii) disused rail crossings;
(iii) an extension of utility service to buildings or other facilities owned or operated by the railroad or
its lessees;
(iv) an extension of utility service at the request of the railroad, its agents or lessees, or other
occupants of railroad land; or
(v) any crossing where the railroad or its predecessor in the affected right-of-way has agreed, in
writing, to provide, at no cost to the utility, easements, licenses, or other authorization to place crossings or
facilities or related improvements or systems.
(b) The crossing fee is a lifetime fee and does not expire for the duration of the crossing.
(4) (a) A utility may request a copy of an annual fee agreement from a railroad if the railroad seeks
to collect an annual fee. If the railroad cannot produce a copy of the original signed annual fee agreement, the
railroad may not charge, assess, or collect an annual fee.
(b) If an annual fee agreement was executed prior to December 31, 2024, and remains in effect,
the railroad may only assess and collect a fee equal to the amount collected in 2024 for an annual fee, but only
for the timeframe that the annual fee agreement remains in effect.
(c) If an annual fee agreement was executed after December 31, 2024, and prior to [the effective
date of this act] and remains in effect, the railroad may only assess and collect a fee equal to the amount it
collected in the first year of the annual fee agreement for that annual fee, but only for the timeframe that the
annual fee agreement remains in effect.
- 5 - Authorized Print Version – HB 933

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 933.1
(d) Annual fees may not be applied to any crossing made after the date that the annual fee is
enacted unless agreed to in the annual fee agreement.
(e) Nothing in this subsection (4) prevents parties from eliminating annual fees based on a
renegotiation of the terms of an agreement.
(5) (a) In addition to the standard crossing fee and based on the railroad traffic at the crossing and
subject to subsection (5)(b), a utility shall reimburse the railroad for any reasonable and necessary flagging
expense, not to exceed $500 for each day the utility is present and actively engaged in deploying facilities in a
railroad right-of-way associated with a crossing.
(b) A flagger fee is not applicable to underground crossings when surface activity is more than 50
feet outside of a railroad right-of-way.
(6) A railroad may charge a fee for reasonable and necessary safety inspections, not to exceed
$170 an hour for each hour the utility is present and actively engaged in deploying facilities within the railroad's
right-of-way. Additional fees, charges, assessments, or other terms related to safety may not be imposed by the
railroad.
(7) (a) If the railroad alleges a crossing will cause a diminution in railroad land value in an amount
greater than the crossing fee provided for in subsection (1), within 15 days after receipt of a completed
application, the railroad shall notify the utility in writing and provide an appraisal demonstrating the diminution in
value of the entire parcel of railroad property caused by the crossing.
(b) If the parties are unable to resolve the issue of compensation under subsection (7)(a), the
dispute must be resolved in accordance with [section 10].
(8) The placement of one or more pipes or conduits and their contents in the same location is a
single facility. Additional fees are not payable based on the individual fibers, wires, lines, or other items
contained within the pipes or conduits.
(9) The utility is not obligated to pay the railroad any other fees, charges, assessments, or other
terms beyond the fees and reimbursements established in this section.

NEW SECTION. Section 8. Certificate of insurance coverage. (1) (a) The certificate of insurance
or coverage submitted by a facility owner that is a municipal utility or municipality must include commercial
- 6 - Authorized Print Version – HB 933

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 933.1
general liability insurance or an equivalent form with a limit of at least $2 million for each occurrence and an
aggregate of at least $5 million.
(b) The certificate of insurance or coverage submitted by a facility owner that provides natural gas
service must include commercial general liability insurance with a combined single limit of at least $5 million for
each occurrence and an aggregate limit of at least $10 million.
(c) The certificate of insurance or coverage submitted by a facility owner not included in subsection
(1)(a) or (1)(b) must include commercial general liability insurance with a combined single limit of at least $2
million for each occurrence and an aggregate limit of at least $5 million.
(2) The railroad may require protective liability insurance with a combined single limit of $2 million
for each occurrence and a $5 million aggregate limit. The coverage may be provided by a blanket railroad
protective liability insurance policy if the coverage, including the coverage limits, applies separately to each
individual crossing. The coverage is required only during the period of construction, repair, or replacement of
the facility.
(3) The insurance coverage under subsections (1) and (2) may be satisfied by the utility using a
combination of primary, excess, or self-insurance. The insurance may not contain an exclusion or limitation
related to railroads or to activities within 50 feet of railroad property.
(4) The certificate of insurance must be from an insurer of the utility's choosing.
(5) The coverage is required only during the period of construction, repair, or replacement of the
facility.

NEW SECTION. Section 9. Relocation -- objection to relocation. (1) (a) Except as provided in
subsections (3) and (4), a railroad may require a utility to relocate a facility when:
(i) the relocation is mutually agreed to by the railroad and the utility within the railroad right-of-way;
(ii) the railroad determines that relocation is essential to accommodate railroad operations; and
(iii) the relocation is not arbitrary or unreasonable.
(b) Before agreeing to a relocation, a utility may require a railroad to provide a statement and
supporting documentation identifying the operational necessity for requesting the relocation.
(c) A utility shall perform the relocation within a reasonable period of time following the agreement.
- 7 - Authorized Print Version – HB 933

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 933.1
(2) Relocation is at the expense of the utility. Additional crossing fees, flagger fees, safety
inspector fees, or any other fee or charges for the relocation may not be assessed by the railroad, a railroad
agent, contractor, or assignee to the utility, or to any agent or contractor of the utility.
(3) If a utility objects to the need for relocation, after reviewing the statement and supporting
documentation, the utility shall, within 15 days after receipt of the statement and supporting documentation,
provide notice of the objection and the specific basis of the objection to the railroad by registered or certified
mail or by means of mutually agreed electronic confirmation of receipt.
(4) (a) If the parties are unable to resolve the objection, either party may submit to arbitration in
accordance with Title 27, chapter 5, for resolution of the objection within 30 calendar days from receipt of the
objection.
(b) Before submitting to arbitration, the parties shall confer in good faith in an attempt to resolve
the objection within 30 days after having provided a notice of objection as required in subsection (3).
(5) If a railroad orders the removal of a crossing with good cause, as outlined in [section 5(6)(b)],
the railroad shall allow for the relocation of the crossing in accordance with this section.

NEW SECTION. Section 10. Objection to crossing -- additional requirements. (1) (a) If a railroad
objects to a utility's proposed crossing because the proposal is a serious threat to the safe operations of the
railroad or to the current use of the railroad right-of-way, the railroad shall notify the utility of the objection and
the specific basis for the objection within 15 days after receipt of the utility's application by registered or certified
mail or by means of mutually agreed electronic confirmation of receipt.
(b) If the railroad imposes additional requirements on a utility for crossing its lines, other than the
proposed crossing being a serious threat to the safe operations of the railroad or to the current use of the
railroad right-of-way, or imposes additional requirements on a utility for crossing lines, the utility may object to
one or more of the requirements.
(c) Notice of objections must be sent by registered or certified mail or by means of mutually agreed
electronic confirmation of receipt.
(2) If the parties are unable to resolve an objection made in accordance with subsection (1), either
party may submit to arbitration in accordance with Title 27, chapter 5, for resolution of the disputed crossing
- 8 - Authorized Print Version – HB 933

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 933.1
application within 30 calendar days from receipt of the objection.
(3) Before submitting to arbitration, the parties shall confer in good faith in an attempt to resolve
the objection.
(4) (a) If arbitration is sought, the arbitrators shall issue a notice of hearing or notice of opportunity
for hearing within 15 calendar days after filing for arbitration and issue an order within 30 calendar days after
the hearing.
(b) A utility may not proceed with construction of a crossing during the 45-calendar-day period for
which notice of a hearing is issued or until expiration of the period during which a hearing could be requested.
(c) The arbitrators shall assess costs associated with arbitration equitably against the parties. The
parties shall pay the costs within 30 calendar days after receipt of a bill for payment for the arbitrators.
(d) The order may be appealed in accordance with Title 25.

NEW SECTION. Section 11. Removal of equipment. On completion of any facility, the utility shall
remove all tools, equipment, or other property used in the construction of the facility and, if railroad property
was moved or disturbed, restore that property to the condition of the property before being moved or disturbed.

NEW SECTION. Section 12. Assignment. (1) (a) Except as provided in subsection (1)(b), a utility
may assign or otherwise transfer any rights to cross a railroad right-of-way to:
(i) a financially responsible entity controlled by, controlling, or under common control of the utility;
(ii) an entity with which the utility is merged or consolidated; or
(iii) an entity that acquires ownership or control of all or substantially all of the transmission assets
of the utility.
(b) A transfer or assignment not included under subsection (1)(a) may not take place without the
written permission of the railroad. Written permission may not be unreasonably withheld.
(2) The utility shall notify the railroad of an assignment made in accordance with subsection (1)(a)
within 30 calendar days.

NEW SECTION. Section 13. Prohibition against mechanic's lien. (1) A utility may not create,
- 9 - Authorized Print Version – HB 933

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 933.1
permit, or cause a mechanic's lien or other lien to be created or enforced against the railroad's property for any
work performed by the utility in connection with the utility's facilities located in the railroad's right-of-way.
(2) A railroad may not create, permit, or suffer a mechanic's lien or other lien of any kind or any
nature to be created or enforced against a utility's property located in the railroad's right-of-way for any work
performed by the railroad in connection with the railroad's facilities.

NEW SECTION. Section 14. Taxes. (1) A utility shall promptly pay or discharge all taxes and
charges levied on a utility's facilities located in the railroad's right-of-way.
(2) If any taxes or charges cannot be separately made or assessed to the utility, but are included
in the taxes or charges assessed to the railroad, the utility shall pay to the railroad an equitable portion of the
taxes, determined by the value of the utility's facilities located on the railroad right-of-way, as compared to the
entire value of the railroad property.

NEW SECTION. Section 15. Reporting requirement -- fee -- rulemaking. (1) Beginning January 1,
2026, and each year after, a facility owner that constructs a crossing and pays a crossing fee or annual fee in
accordance with [sections 1 through 15] shall file a construction completion report with the department of
transportation summarizing:
(a) crossing agreements, insurance coverage submitted by the facility owner; and
(b) fees paid to a railroad within 60 days after facility completion.
(2) (a) The report must be accompanied by a filing fee commensurate with the crossing fee paid to
the railroad in accordance with [sections 1 through 15].
(b) The fee must be deposited in the state special revenue fund to the credit of the local road and
bridge account and used for the purposes provided in 15-70-132.
(3) The department may adopt rules establishing the requirements of reports filed in accordance
with this section.

NEW SECTION. Section 16. Codification instruction. [Sections 1 through 15] are intended to be
codified as an integral part of Title 69, chapter 14, and the provisions of Title 69, chapter 14, apply to [sections
- 10 - Authorized Print Version – HB 933

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 933.1
1 through 15].

NEW SECTION. Section 17. Saving clause. [This act] does not affect rights and duties that
matured, penalties that were incurred, or proceedings that were begun before [the effective date of this act].

NEW SECTION. Section 18. Severability. If a part of [this act] is invalid, all valid parts that are
severable from the invalid part remain in effect. If a part of [this act] is invalid in one or more of its applications,
the part remains in effect in all valid applications that are severable from the invalid applications.

NEW SECTION. Section 19. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.

NEW SECTION. Section 20. Applicability. [This act] applies to crossings:
(1) in existence prior to October 1, 2025; and
(2) commenced after September 30, 2025.
- END -
- 11 - Authorized Print Version – HB 933